Hawaii statutes.
§444-21 Death or dissociation. No
copartnership, joint venture, or corporation shall be deemed to have violated
any provision of this chapter by acting or assuming to act as a contractor
after the death or dissociation of a licensee who had the direct management of
the contracting business thereof prior to final disposition by the contractors
license board of an application for a license made within thirty days from the
date of the death or dissociation. [L 1957, c 305, §1(s 20); Supp, §166A-20;
HRS §444-21]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next